Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.121.020

Program established.

The food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship program is established. The program shall be administered by the university. In administering the program, the university has the following powers and duties:

(1) To select, in consultation with the college, up to two students each year to receive conditional scholarships;

(2) To adopt necessary rules and guidelines;

(3) To publicize the program;

(4) To collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet their obligations under this chapter; and

(5) To solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the program.

[ 2008 c 208 s 3.]